Utah statutes.
50-2-4.   Discrimination in service charges forbidden.

All associations of persons and corporations engaged in the business of gathering and disseminating information or news for publication by their members or stockholders, or otherwise, shall be deemed to be engaged in a business in which the public is interested, and shall furnish such news to any and all newspapers desiring to publish the same at the same price as charged to the members of such association or corporation, or stockholders of any such corporation, without discrimination between the members or stockholders and such newspapers desiring to publish such information and news; and shall render equal and impartial service to all publishers of newspapers who shall offer to pay a reasonable price therefor.

